Utah statutes.
58-67-801.   Disclosure of financial interest by licensee.
(1)  Licensees under this chapter may not refer patients, clients, or
customers to any clinical laboratory, ambulatory or surgical care facilities,
or other treatment or rehabilitation services such as physical therapy,
cardiac rehabilitation, radiology services, dispensing optical lens facility,
or lithotripsy, in which the licensee or a member of the licensee's immediate
family has any financial relationship as that term is described in 42 U.S.C.
1395nn, unless the licensee at the time of making the referral discloses that
relationship, in writing, to the patient, client, or customer.
(2)  The written disclosure under Subsection (1) shall also state the patient
may choose any facility or service center for purpose of having the laboratory
work or treatment service performed.
